Washington statutes.
RCW 36.47.050

County officials—Further action authorized—Meetings.

The county officials enumerated in RCW 36.47.020 are authorized to take such further action as they deem necessary to comply with the intent of this chapter, including attendance at state and district meetings which may be required to formulate the reports provided for in *RCW 36.47.020.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 5 s 4; 1963 c 4 s 36.47.050. Prior: 1959 c 130 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 36.47.020 was amended by 1998 c 245 s 28, removing the requirement to submit reports.